it: Numero di cifre: 1 cifra; 2 cifre; 3 cifre; 4 cifre; Altro
da: Antal cifre: 1 ciffer; 2 cifre; 3 cifre; 4 cifre; Andet
el: Αριθμός ψηφίων: 1 ψηφίο; 2 ψηφία; 3 ψηφία; 4 ψηφία; Άλλο
fr: Nombre de chiffres: 1 chiffre; 2 chiffres; 3 chiffres; 4 chiffres; Autre
sk-SK: Počet číslic: 1-miestne; 2-miestne; 3-miestne; 4-miestne; Iné
cs: Počet číslic: 1místný; 2místný; 3místný; 4místný; Ostatní
pl: Liczba cyfr: 1-cyfrowy; 2-cyfrowy; 3-cyfrowy; 4-cyfrowy; Inne
lt-LT: Skaitmenų skaičius: 1 skaitmens; 2 skaitmenų; 3 skaitmenų; 4 skaitmenų; Kita
ro-RO: Număr de cifre: 1 cifră; 2 cifre; 3 cifre; 4 cifre; Altele
fi: Numeroiden lukumäärä: 1-numeroinen; 2-numeroinen; 3-numeroinen; 4-numeroinen; Muu
pt-BR: Dígitos número: 1 dígito; 2 dígitos; 3 dígitos; 4 dígitos; Outro
vi: Số chữ số: 1 chữ số; 2 chữ số; 3 chữ số; 4 chữ số; Khác
pt-PT: Número de dígitos: 1 dígito; 2 dígitos; 3 dígitos; 4 dígitos; Outro
ko: 자릿수: 1자리; 2자리; 3자리; 4자리; 기타
bg-BG: Брой цифри: 1-цифрен; 2-цифрен; 3-цифрен; 4-цифрен; Друго
es: Cantidad de dígitos: 1 dígito; 2 dígitos; 3 dígitos; 4 dígitos; Otro
sv: Antal siffror: 1-siffrig; 2-siffrig; 3-siffrig; 4-siffrig; Övrigt
de: Anzahl der Ziffern: 1-stellig; 2-stellig; 3-stellig; 4-stellig; Andere
hr-HR: Broj znamenki: 1 znamenka; 2 znamenke; 3 znamenke; 4 znamenke; Ostalo
ru: Количество разрядов: 1-значный; 2-значный; 3-значный; 4-значный; Другое
hu: Számjegyek száma: 1 számjegyű; 2 számjegyű; 3 számjegyű; 4 számjegyű; Egyéb
nl: Aantal cijfers: 1-cijferig; 2-cijferig; 3-cijferig; 4-cijferig; Overig
zh-CN: 数字位数: 1 位数; 2 位数; 3 位数; 4 位数; 其他
sl-SI: Število števk: 1-mestno; 2-mestno; 3-mestno; 4-mestno; Drugo
th: จำนวนตัวเลข: 1 หลัก; 2 หลัก; 3 หลัก; 4 หลัก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 位數: 1 位數; 2 位數; 3 位數; 4 位數; 其他
ja: 桁数: 1桁; 2桁; 3桁; 4桁; その他
nb: Antall sifre: 1-sifret; 2-sifret; 3-sifret; 4-sifret; Annet
en: Number of digits: 1-digit; 2-digit; 3-digit; 4-digit; Other
tr: Basamak sayısı: 1 haneli; 2 haneli; 3 haneli; 4 haneli; Diğer